North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-18.2 Professional Development Plans

15.1-18.2-01.
Professional development plan — Adoption — Review by school district. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 43.

15.1-18.2-02.
Professional development plan — Review by superintendent of public instruction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 43.

15.1-18.2-03.
Professional development advisory committee — Duties — Staff support. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 43.

15.1-18.2-03.1.
Professional development advisory committee — Reimbursement of members. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 43.

15.1-18.2-04.
Student athletics — Concussion management program — Requirements.

Each school district and nonpublic school that sponsors or sanctions any athletic activity in this state and requires a participating student to regularly practice or train, and compete, is subject to the terms of a concussion management program.

The concussion management program must set forth in clear and readily comprehensible language the signs and symptoms of a concussion.

The concussion management program must require that a student be removed from practice, training, or competition if:

The student reports any sign or symptom of a concussion, as set forth in accordance with this section;

The student exhibits any sign or symptom of a concussion, as set forth in accordance with this section; or

A licensed, registered, or certified health care provider whose scope of practice includes the recognition of concussion signs and symptoms determines, after observing the student, that the student may have a concussion.

The duty to remove a student under the conditions set forth in this subsection extends to:

Each official;

The coach of a student; and

Any other individual designated by the school district or nonpublic school as having direct responsibility for the student during practice, training, or competition.

The concussion management program must require that any student who is removed in accordance with subsection 3 must be evaluated as soon as practicable by a licensed health care provider who is acting within the provider’s scope of practice and trained in the evaluation and management of concussion, as determined by the provider’s licensing board.

A student who is evaluated in accordance with subsection 4 and believed to have suffered a concussion may not be allowed to return to practice, training, or competition until the student’s return is authorized by a licensed health care provider who meets the criteria set forth in subsection 4.

The authorization required by this subsection must be:

In writing;

Presented or forwarded to the individual designated by the student’s school district or nonpublic school for receipt of such authorizations; and

Retained by the student’s school district or school for a period of seven years after conclusion of the student’s enrollment.

Any health care provider who signs an authorization in accordance with this section is acknowledging that the provider is acting within the provider’s scope of practice and is trained in the evaluation and management of concussion, as determined by the provider’s licensing board.

The concussion management program must require that each official, coach, and individual designated by the school district or nonpublic school as having direct responsibility for the student during practice, training, or competition receive biennial training regarding the nature and risk of concussion.

The student’s school district or nonpublic school shall ensure that before a student is allowed to participate in the athletic activity described in subsection 1, the student and the student’s parent shall document that they have viewed information regarding concussions incurred by students participating in athletic activities. The required information must be provided by the student’s school district or nonpublic school and must be made available in printed form or in a verifiable electronic format.

This section does not create any liability for, or create a cause of action against:

A school district, its officers, or its employees;

A nonpublic school, its officers, or its employees; or

An official.

A school district or a nonpublic school may contract for and accept gifts, grants, and donations from any public or nonpublic source, in order to meet the requirements of this section.

For the purposes of this section, “official” means an umpire, a referee, a judge, or any other individual formally officiating at an athletic event.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 139, § 1; 2013, ch. 153, § 1.

15.1-18.2-05.
Teacher support program — Establishment.

The education standards and practices board shall:

Establish and administer a teacher support program;

Employ an individual to serve as a teacher support program coordinator;

Select and train experienced teachers who will serve as mentors for first-year teachers and assist the first-year teachers with instructional skills development; or

If a school district or other employing entity listed in section 15.1-18.2-07 is not in need of mentors for its first-year teachers, select and train experienced teachers who will work with school district administrators and administrators from the other employing entities to identify the needs of the non-first-year teachers and help the non-first-year teachers address their particular needs through the use of:

Research-validated interventions; and

Proven instructional methods.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 6.

15.1-18.2-06.
Teacher support program — Availability of services.

The education standards and practices board may use any moneys it receives for the teacher support program to provide staff compensation, training, evaluation, and stipends for mentors and experienced teachers who assist first-year and non-first-year teachers participating in the program, and to pay for any other administrative expenses resulting from the program; provided, however, that the board may not expend more than five percent of the moneys for administrative purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 7.

15.1-18.2-07.
Teacher support program — Authorized service recipients.

The education standards and practices board may provide support services to teachers employed by:

School districts;

Special education units;

Area career and technology centers;

Regional education associations; and

Schools funded by the bureau of Indian education.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 8.